data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="εξ/έλιξη__n_f">
      <e><p><l>έλιξη</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλιξης</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλιξη</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλιξη</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελίξεις</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελίξεων</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελίξεως</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελίξεις</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελίξεις</l><r>έλιξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="σ/ύνθεη__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ύνθεση</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύνθεσης</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύνθεση</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύνθεση</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υνθέσεις</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υνθέσεων</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υνθέσεως</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υνθέσεις</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υνθέσεις</l><r>ύνθεη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κουν/έλι__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>έλι</l><r>έλι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελιού</l><r>έλι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλι</l><r>έλι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλια</l><r>έλι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ελιών</l><r>έλι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έλια</l><r>έλι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="παρα/ίσθηση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ίσθηση</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ισθήσεως</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίσθηση</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίσθηση</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ισθήσεις</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ισθήσεων</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ισθήσεις</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ισθήσεις</l><r>ίσθηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/άθειρξη__n_f">
      <e><p><l>άθειρξη</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άθειρξης</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άθειρξη</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άθειρξη</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αθείρξεις</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αθείρξεων</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αθείρξεως</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αθείρξεις</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αθείρξεις</l><r>άθειρξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μίσ/ος__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ος</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ους</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ος</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ος</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>η</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>η</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>η</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/άγγελος__n_m">
      <e><p><l>άγγελος</l><r>άγγελος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αγγέλου</l><r>άγγελος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άγγελο</l><r>άγγελος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άγγελοι</l><r>άγγελος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αγγέλων</l><r>άγγελος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αγγέλους</l><r>άγγελος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ον__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ον</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντος</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ον</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ον</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντα</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντων</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντα</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όντα</l><r>ον<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="φυλ/άκιση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>άκιση</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άκισης</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άκιση</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άκιση</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακίσεις</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακίσεων</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακίσεως</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακίσεις</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ακίσεις</l><r>άκιση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="χ/έρι__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>έρι</l><r>έρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εριού</l><r>έρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρι</l><r>έρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρια</l><r>έρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εριών</l><r>έρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρια</l><r>έρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="νου/ς__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ς</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="άγγελος"><i></i><par n="/άγγελος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κουνέλι"><i>κουν</i><par n="κουν/έλι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="παραίσθηση"><i>παρα</i><par n="παρα/ίσθηση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="χέρι"><i>χ</i><par n="χ/έρι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="νους"><i>νου</i><par n="νου/ς__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ον"><i></i><par n="/ον__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="σύνθεση"><i>σ</i><par n="σ/ύνθεη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="εξέλιξη"><i>εξ</i><par n="εξ/έλιξη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="φυλάκιση"><i>φυλ</i><par n="φυλ/άκιση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="κάθειρξη"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/άθειρξη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="μίσος"><i>μίσ</i><par n="μίσ/ος__n_nt"/></e>
